Wisconsin, session 2025, SB693.
do enact as follows:SB693,14Section 1. 20.005 (3) (schedule) of the statutes: at the appropriate place, 5insert the following amounts for the purposes indicated: - See PDF for table SB693,25Section 2. 20.370 (6) (fx) of the statutes is created to read:SB693,2,9620.370 (6) (fx) Town of Norway water abatement. From the environmental 7fund, from the moneys received by the department for nonpoint source water 8pollution abatement, the amounts in the schedule for the grant under 2025 9Wisconsin Act .... (this act), section 4 (1).SB693,310Section 3. 20.370 (6) (fx) of the statutes, as created by 2025 Wisconsin Act .... 11(this act), is repealed.SB693,412Section 4. Nonstatutory provisions.SB693,2,1613(1) Town of Norway water abatement. From the appropriation under s. 1420.370 (6) (fx), not later than June 30, 2026, the department of natural resources 15shall award a grant in the amount of $200,000 to the town of Norway in Racine 16County for water abatement.SB693,517Section 5. Effective dates. This act takes effect on the day after 18publication, except as follows:SB693,2,2019(1) Town of Norway water abatement. The repeal of s. 20.370 (6) (fx) takes 20effect on July 1, 2027.SB693,2,2121